Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-315.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree; penalties.

Except under circumstance constituting sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree as defined by W.S.

6-2-314

, an actor commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree if:

Being seventeen (17) years of age or older, the actor inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim who is thirteen (13) through fifteen (15) years of age, and the victim is at least four (4) years younger than the actor;

Being sixteen (16) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual contact of a victim who is less than thirteen (13) years of age;

Being eighteen (18) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual contact with a victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of age and the actor is the victim’s legal guardian or an individual specified in W.S.

6-4-402

; or

Being eighteen (18) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual contact with a victim who is less than sixteen (16) years of age and the actor occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim.

A person convicted under subsection (a) of this section is subject to imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years, unless the person convicted qualifies under W.S. 6-2-306(e).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Requirements.—

It was not enough for the State to establish that defendant caused or allowed the minor victim to touch the clothing immediately covering his intimate parts; the State also had to establish that he did so with the intent of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse. Armajo v. State, 2020 WY 153, 478 P.3d 184,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2020).

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence permitted a reasonable jury to conclude that defendant caused or allowed the touching to occur for the purpose of sexual gratification, as he had previously touched the victim while telling her how to perform a ritual and been warned not to do so, and during a trip three days before the charged incident, he told the victim that he had a dream about her having his child and warned her not to tell her mother. Armajo v. State, 2020 WY 153, 478 P.3d 184,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2020).

Constitutionality. —

Defendants'
convictions for violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-315(a)(i) and

6-2-316

after they had consensual sexual intercourse with 15-year-old victims were proper because the statutes were not ambiguous and their meaning and scope could be readily determined by reading the sexual assault statutes in pari materia; the appellate court rejected defendants'
statutory construction contentions, as well as their unconstitutionally vague as applied challenges.
Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2009).

Defendant
was not subjected to cruel and/or unusual punishment, under the United
States and Wyoming Constitutions, when defendant was sentenced to
life in prison without the possibility of parole, upon defendant's
second conviction for sexual abuse of a minor. Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157, 339 P.3d 267,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2014).

Admissibility of evidence.—

In a case in which a jury convicted defendant of three counts of sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, the district court did not abuse its discretion in admitting evidence that defendant was in violation of his parole at the time of the offenses. Testimony concerning defendant's parole status and prohibition of association with minors was relevant to defendant's motive for lying to his parole agent. Vasquez v. State, 2016 WY 129, 386 P.3d 350,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence Sufficient.

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for second-degree sexual abuse of a minor because his effort to mask his actions by placing a blanket over himself and the girls, his repeated touchings of the girls in virtually identical ways, and his instructions to keep the touchings secret supported a finding of intent of sexual gratification.
Jones v. State, 2019 WY 45, 439 P.3d 753,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

5

(Wyo. 2019);
Pier v. State, 2019 WY 3, 432 P.3d 890,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2019).

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for second-degree sexual abuse of a minor because the victim’s testimony that defendant touched her “a little over her privates” provided sufficient evidence to permit a rational trier of fact to find that he had engaged in sexual contact with the victim’s intimate parts beyond a reasonable doubt.
Jones v. State, 2019 WY 45, 439 P.3d 753,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

5

(Wyo. 2019);

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(April 23, 2019).

Jury instructions. —

In a case
where defendant was charged with attempted second degree sexual abuse
of a minor in Count III of the information, after being questioned
by the jury regarding what act defendant was accused of attempting
to commit in Count III, the district court did not err in providing
a supplemental jury instruction consistent with the information that
the act alleged in Count III was the attempted touching of the victim's
vaginal area. Brown v. State, 2015 WY 4, 340 P.3d 1020,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2015).

Although the district court erred by failing to define substantial step for the jury and by including the concept of attempt in the elements of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor when instructing the jury, counsel was not ineffective in failing to object to the instructions as defendant was not prejudiced by the failure to object because the evidence against him was overwhelming as defendant’s statements over several weeks confirmed he had the specific intent to inflict sexual intrusion upon the victim and his actions were strongly corroborative of the firmness of his intention to complete the crime of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

No Breach of Plea Agreement. —

State did not breach the plea agreement by stating defendant pleaded guilty to three felony counts of sexual abuse of a minor when in fact he pleaded no contest; the statements were harmless, because there was no sentencing agreement and the district court was not misled by the statements. The district court sentenced defendant 10 to 15 years in prison for the second degree offense under this section, suspended for 10 years of supervised probation.
Mercer v. State, 2012 WY 54, 273 P.3d 1100,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence Sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of second-degree sexual abuse of a child under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-315(a)(ii) and was sufficient to support the jury's conclusion that defendant touched his victim, a seven-year-old boy, with the intent of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse because the jury heard the testimony of the victim and the victim's mother, who was defendant's former girlfriend, that defendant would spook with the victim while lying with him in bed and the jury also heard the testimony of the investigating detective that defendant admitted to having an erection when he cuddled with the boy. Although there was no direct testimony that defendant touched the victim's genitals while lying in bed with him, the fact that defendant frequently would lay with the victim knowing that he would be aroused could have led the jury to reasonably infer that, when defendant did touch the boy's genitals on other occasions, he did so with the intent of becoming sexually aroused.
Jones v. State, 2010 WY 44, 228 P.3d 867,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2010).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor, his niece, because he was connected with the victim by affinity as defendant was the victim's uncle by marriage, and, thus, he occupied a position of authority in relation to the victim; and because the State was not required to demonstrate that defendant was able to exercise significant influence over the victim as he was tried and convicted based on his position as the victim's relative. Butler v. State, 2015 WY 119, 358 P.3d 1259,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2015).

Victim's statement that defendant placed her hand on his penis suggested sexual intent, and that inference was enhanced by defendant's effort to mask his actions by placing a blanket over his midsection and the victim's statement that his reaction to the touching was to “just smile,” supporting a conviction for second-degree sexual abuse of a minor. Jones v. State, 2017 WY 44, 393 P.3d 1257,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2017).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of attempted sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree because he sent messages to the victim on a social media website that stated in extremely graphic detail about his desire to have sexual intercourse and oral sex with the victim; and he took a substantial step to complete the crime as the jury could reasonably infer that defendant was driving to the apartments where he and the victim agreed to meet to pick the victim up and inflict sexual intrusion upon her. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence Insufficient. —

Evidence was insufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree because defendant's statements, on their own, were insufficient to uphold his convictions for second-degree sexual abuse. There was never an allegation made by the victim or his mother at trial, or to any of the multiple medical care providers or the forensic interviewer, that defendant engaged in sexual contact with the victim. Mersereau v. State, 2012 WY 125, 286 P.3d 97,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2012).

Cited

in

Rogers v. State, 2008 WY 90, 189 P.3d 265,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(July 31, 2008); McDowell v. State, 2014 WY 21,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 22

, 2014 WL 547499 (Feb 11, 2014); Deeds v. State, 2014 WY 124,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct. 3, 2014); Galbreath v. State, 2015 WY 49,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Mar. 27, 2015); Lindstrom v. State, 2015 WY 28,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 25, 2015); Miller v. State, 2015 WY 72,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(May 15, 2015); Hamilton v. State, 2017 WY 72, 396 P.3d 1009,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted in

DRW v. DLP (In re ARW), 2015 WY 25, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
24 (Feb. 19, 2015); Hathaway v. State, 2017 WY 92, 399 P.3d 625,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2017); Carrier v. State, 2017 WY 88, 400 P.3d 358,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 6-2-316.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree.

Except under circumstance constituting sexual abuse of a minor in the first or second degree as defined by W.S.

6-2-314

and

6-2-315

, an actor commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree if:

Being seventeen (17) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual contact with a victim who is thirteen (13) through fifteen (15) years of age, and the victim is at least four (4) years younger than the actor;

Being twenty (20) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual intrusion with a victim who is either sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age, and the victim is at least four (4) years younger than the actor, and the actor occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim;

Being less than sixteen (16) years of age, the actor inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim who is less than thirteen (13) years of age, and the victim is at least three (3) years younger than the actor; or

Being seventeen (17) years of age or older, the actor knowingly takes immodest, immoral or indecent liberties with a victim who is less than seventeen (17) years of age and the victim is at least four (4) years younger than the actor.

A person convicted under subsection (a) of this section is subject to imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years.

A person charged with violating the provisions of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section shall be subject to the original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, except the matter may be transferred to the district court having jurisdiction of the offense as provided in W.S.

14-6-237

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Statute not unconstitutionally vague. —

Because the words “indecent liberties” have a definite meaning and because a person of ordinary intelligence can weigh his contemplated conduct against a prohibition of taking immodest, immoral or indecent liberties or assault against a child and know whether or not such contemplated conduct is proscribed by it, this section is not unconstitutionally vague. Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979).

Defendants'
convictions for violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-315(a)(i) and

6-2-316

after they had consensual sexual intercourse with 15-year-old victims were proper because the statutes were not ambiguous and their meaning and scope could be readily determined by reading the sexual assault statutes in pari materia; the appellate court rejected defendants'
statutory construction contentions, as well as their unconstitutionally vague as applied challenges.
Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2009).

This section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to the defendant, convicted of taking immodest, immoral and indecent liberties with two minors. A person of ordinary intelligence would have known that fondling the genitals of two teenage boys was clearly conduct which was forbidden under this section. Britt v. State, 752 P.2d 426,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1988).

Wyoming's indecent liberty statute is not unconstitutionally vague; the statute applies, without question, to certain activities, one of which is sexual intercourse with a minor. Ochoa v. State, 848 P.2d 1359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1993).

Section is not unconstitutional as violative of principle of vagueness. See Moore v. State, 912 P.2d 1113,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1996).

Defendant's constitutional challenge of vagueness failed where defendant had fair notice that a sexual relationship with an inexperienced sixteen year old child, consummated in deliberate disregard of her parents' interdiction and while still legally married, is prohibited conduct in Wyoming, and there was no evidence that the statute was enforced in a discriminatory manner. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

The statute was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to the prosecution of a 17-year-old male who had consensual sexual intercourse with a 13-year-old female; the statute was not only intended to apply to acts committed by an adult with a minor, and a reasonably intelligent 17-year-old could determine that sexual intercourse with a 13-year-old was conduct forbidden by the statute. Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 534 U.S. 1092, 122 S. Ct. 836, 151 L. Ed. 2d 716, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 18 (U.S. 2002).

The indecent liberties statute as applied to the facts of defendant's case was not unconstitutionally vague. The statutory language provided sufficient notice that consensual intercourse with a 16 year-old is criminal behavior even though that conduct does not offend the third degree sexual assault statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a)(i) (repealed), because of the extreme age difference (defendant was 34) and the fact that consent of a minor is not a complete defense to the charge of taking indecent liberties. Moe v. State, 2005 WY 58, 110 P.3d 1206,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 29, 2005).

This section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to defendant's conduct, common sense of society would regard the videotaping of sexual acts with a seven-year-old child as a violation of the statute, and a person of ordinary intelligence has sufficient notice that such conduct is illegal.
Ruby v. State, 2006 WY 133, 144 P.3d 425,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2006).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-105(a) (repealed) was not unconstitutional as applied to defendant who engaged in clandestine efforts to video tape victims in their bedroom in an attempt to obtain nude or partially nude images of them; defendant obtained and preserved those images, and his attempts to mislead the investigating officer and dispose of the camera and video tapes provided evidentiary support indicating that he knew his conduct was unlawful. Rabuck v. State, 2006 WY 25, 129 P.3d 861,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2006).

Statute of taking immoral liberties with a child under 18, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-105

(repealed), was not unconstitutional as facially vague, and was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to 21-year-old defendant convicted of consensual sex with a 16-year-old, since such conduct had previously been determined to violate the statute; moreover, although defendant briefly mentioned the lack of an extreme age difference as a mitigating factor, he admitted that he understood that his conduct was wrong and that he should have waited until the 16-year-old victim was 18 years old before having sex with her.
Stokes v. State, 2006 WY 134, 144 P.3d 421,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2006).

Issue of facial vagueness settled under the doctrine of stare decisis. —

Applying the doctrine of stare decisis, the court held that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-105

(repealed) is not facially unconstitutional. The analysis and conclusions in Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(2004) on the issue of facial vagueness have settled the issue. Moe v. State, 2005 WY 58, 110 P.3d 1206,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 29, 2005).

Construction with other law. —

The legislature intended criminal liability under this section to entail conduct which is more culpable than the conduct which constitutes guilt under W.S. §

6-2-304

. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

The sexual assault statutes, §

6-2-301

et seq., protect all persons while the indecent liberties statute, §

14-3-105

(repealed), only offers protection to those less than 18 years of age and is also limited in that it is applicable only in those circumstances not constituting first, second or third degree sexual assault. Thus, §

14-3-105

(repealed) criminalizes activities that are otherwise permissible between consenting adults when one of the parties is under the age of 18 years. Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2004).

Department of Homeland Security did not err in ordering an alien’s expedited removal under 8 U.S.C.S. § 1227(a)(2)(A)(iii) due to his Wyoming conviction of third-degree sexual abuse of a minor because a person convicted under this section necessarily committed sexual abuse of a minor under the Immigration and Nationality Act. Bedolla-Zarate v. Sessions, 892 F.3d 1137, 2018 U.S. App. LEXIS 16250 (10th Cir. 2018).

Equal protection rights of defendant not violated. —

There was no violation of the equal protection rights of the defendant 17-year-old male when he, but not the 13-year-old female with whom he had consensual sex, was charged with a violation of the statute. Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 534 U.S. 1092, 122 S. Ct. 836, 151 L. Ed. 2d 716, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 18 (U.S. 2002).

Section is not unconstitutional

as violative of the principles of separation of church and state, equal protection or vagueness. Moore v. State, 912 P.2d 1113,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1996).

Right of privacy in sexual relations. —

The sexual conduct protected by the fundamental right to privacy extends only to sexual relations between adults. Ochoa v. State, 848 P.2d 1359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1993).

Prosecutorial discretion warranted second-degree sexual assault charge. —

It was within the prosecutor's discretion to charge attempted second-degree sexual assault, instead of taking indecent liberties with a minor. Bueno-Hernandez v. State, 724 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 480 U.S. 907, 107 S. Ct. 1353, 94 L. Ed. 2d 523, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 1004 (U.S. 1987).

Alleging general time period in information and bill of particulars sufficient. —

Since a specific date is not essential to the commission of indecent liberties with a minor, an information supplemented by a bill of particulars which stated that “on or about April 9, 1985, the defendant had sexual relations with JF” was sufficient to give defendant notice and allow him to adequately prepare a defense. Stewart v. State, 724 P.2d 439,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 605

(Wyo. 1986).

Information was sufficient. —

An information gave sufficient notice to the defendant in a prosecution for committing an immoral act with a minor where the defendant admitted that he was in the bathtub with his young son and had an erection, notwithstanding that he testified that this event occurred in June of 1988, rather than June of 1989 or 1990 as the information and amended information alleged. Baumgartner v. State, 7 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2000).

Specific intent is not element of crime.

There is no requisite intent other than that evidenced by the doing of the act constituting the offense, that is: knowingly taking immodest, immoral and indecent liberties with any child. Britt v. State, 752 P.2d 426,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1988).

Defendant appropriately charged with indecent liberties. —

Where defendant exposed himself to both children, but forced only one to perform fellatio while the other child watched, it was appropriate to charge defendant with indecent liberties upon the child who was forced to watch but suffered no sexual contact or intrusion and thus did not fall within the exclusionary language of this section. Griswold v. State, 994 P.2d 920,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's conviction of taking indecent liberties with daughters not barred under §

6-4-402

(incest). —

Sections

6-2-303

(sexual assault) and

6-4-402

(incest) and this section all concern sexual activities, but one cannot be said to be more specific than the others. Therefore, the defendant's convictions under §

6-2-303

and this section were not barred under §

6-4-402

, even though the victims of his acts were his daughters, ages four and six years. Kallas v. State, 704 P.2d 693,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 525

(Wyo. 1985).

Pertinent age of victim, prior to 1978, was set at under 18 years.

See McArtor v. State, 699 P.2d 288,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 481

(Wyo. 1985).

And, after 1978, 19 years. —

Reading the provisions of this title in pari materia, and giving full effect to §

14-1-101

(age of majority), a reference to “child” or “minor” in this title, other than when a specific age is set, is to an individual under the age of 19 years. This section does not set another specific age. Therefore, the word “child” in this section refers to one under the age of 19 years. Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

Evidence sufficient to support revocation of probation.

See Roberts v. State, 912 P.2d 1110,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1996).

District court did not err in revoking defendant's probation, where a probation officer found a woman and her minor son hiding in defendant's hotel room. Although defendant was clearly instructed that having the child in his room was violation of his probation, the mother and child were again in the room when the probation officer returned with law enforcement.
Forbes v. State, 2009 WY 146, 220 P.3d 510,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence sufficient to support a conviction for sexual abuse
of a minor in the third degree. —

Evidence supported
a conviction for sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree, as
the
jury could reasonably have concluded that defendant took “immodest,
immoral or indecent liberties” with the victim based on the
victim's testimony that he pulled down her shirt to expose her breasts
and grabbed her breasts from behind and pushed her to floor, and
testimony
from the victim's mother that she participated in sexual
abuse of
the victim by putting a sleeping pill in the victim's milkshake. Rhodes v. State, 2015 WY 60, 348 P.3d 404,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence of other sexual misconduct admissible. —

Testimony of the victim's older sister, relating a course of sexual misconduct occurring between herself and the defendant, was admissible, where such testimony was particularly relevant for the purpose of corroborating the witness's tesimony. Gezzi v. State, 780 P.2d 972,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1989).

The court did not commit prejudicial error in a child sexual assault case by admitting into evidence the defendant's statement to Utah social worker that he had fondled a 10-year-old girl in Utah in July of 1984. The evidence proved intent, identity, and motive. Johnson v. State, 872 P.2d 93,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1994).

Evidence of prior conviction harmless. —

Where the only additional information presented to the jury besides the fact, nature, and date of defendant's prior felony conviction was the length and date of imprisonment, it was unlikely that such information had any impact upon the verdict. Moe v. State, 2005 WY 149, 123 P.3d 148,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 2005), cert. denied, 547 U.S. 1046, 126 S. Ct. 1633, 164 L. Ed. 2d 345, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 2609 (U.S. 2006).

Evidence sufficient to support conviction on second degree sexual assault and indecent liberties charges. —

There was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of both second degree sexual assault and indecent liberties, and defendant failed to demonstrate how the district court abused its discretion during his trial in admitting expert testimony and prior bad acts evidence. Griswold v. State, 994 P.2d 920,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1999).

Child witness. —

Defendant's conviction of second-degree sexual assault, third degree sexual assault, and indecent liberties with a minor was upheld where the trial court held a hearing to determine the competency of the five-year old child victim to testify as to the sexual assault; no separate taint hearing was required because defendant did not come forward with some evidence that taint was present, and the competency inquiry, the five-part test to determine the competency of child witnesses, included the question of pretrial taint. Morganflash v. State, 2003 WY 120, 76 P.3d 830,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2003).

Expert's opinion on defendant's guilt requires reversal. —

Permitting expert witnesses to offer opinions that the defendant was guilty of sexually abusing his son, and allowing one of the expert witnesses to vouch for the credibility of the victim, was plain error, requiring reversal of the defendant's conviction. Stephens v. State, 774 P.2d 60,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2008).

Jury instructions prejudicial. —

Where the jury instructions did not properly inform the jury of the circumstances under which defendant could be convicted of the crime of taking indecent liberties, the jury instructions were prejudicial to defendant and reversal was necessary. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

In child sexual assault case, following instruction, proposed by defendant, was properly refused:

“The crime with which the defendant is charged is likely to create a strong prejudice against an accused. Thus, you should bear in mind the difficulty of defending against such a charge and consider carefully all the evidence and instructions of the court.” Johnson v. State, 872 P.2d 93,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1994).

Impermissible closing argument. —

Indecent liberties statute punishes inappropriate sexual conduct with children; consequently, a statement suggesting that providing drugs to children violates §

14-3-105

(repealed) would be incorrect. Burton v. State, 2002 WY 71, 46 P.3d 309,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. June 18, 2002).

Immodest liberties not lesser included offense of sexual assault. —

Jury instruction that taking of immodest, immoral or indecent liberties with a child was a lesser included offense of second-degree sexual assault (§

6-2-303

) was reversible error. Derksen v. State, 845 P.2d 1383,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1993).

Merger of sexual assault offense and indecent liberties offense. —

For purposes of sentencing, a merger of a sexual assault offense and an indecent liberties offense may occur when the facts which have been proven at trial establish that the defendant committed only one criminal act. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Consent as a defense. —

The consent of the minor is not a complete defense to the charge of taking indecent liberties. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

Indecent liberties is not a “violent felony” as that phrase is defined by Wyoming law.

See Cooley v. State, 885 P.2d 875,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1994).

Sentencing. —

The trial court abused its discretion in relying on a presentence investigation report without making a record or a finding as to the reliability of the information and in relying on a purported victim impact statement made by someone other than the victim, and thus the defendant's sentence under this section was reversed and resentencing was ordered. Bitz v. State, 2003 WY 140, 78 P.3d 257,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2003).

No abuse in sentencing. —

There was no abuse of discretion, under the following facts, in sentencing the defendant to consecutive sentences of six to 10 years and eight to 10 years: (1) the victims were not only young but also of limited mentality and (2) the mother of the victims was also “functioning subnormal.” Munden v. State, 698 P.2d 621,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1985).

No abuse of discretion in sentencing defendant to seven-to-10 years. See MJP v. State, 706 P.2d 1108,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1985), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Although defendant's maximum term of imprisonment for two convictions under this section was 10 years, his original sentence was imprisonment for not less than 18 months or more than 60 months. However, defendant was placed on probation for a period of eight years, but five months after the original sentencing hearing had been held, the district court revoked defendant's probation and reinstated his original sentence. Because neither appellant's period of probation nor his term of incarceration exceeded the maximum term of imprisonment, his sentence was legal. Leyba v. State, 882 P.2d 863,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1994).

Sentence of 17 to 25 years in a case where guilty pleas were entered to third-degree sexual assault and one count of immodest, immoral, or indecent acts with a minor was not disproportionate to the crimes where defendant was accused of touching teenage girls inappropriately for his own sexual gratification; moreover, he was acting like a sexual predator when he groomed the girls.
Hubbard v. State, 2008 WY 12, 175 P.3d 625,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2008).

Rejection of sentencing recommendation. —

Trial court did not commit plain error by rejecting defendant's
sentencing recommendation and instead imposing a sentence of 22 to
24 years in prison after he entered an Alford plea to three counts
of first degree sexual abuse of a minor and one count of third degree
sexual abuse of a minor because defendant failed to establish that
the trial court found a lack of remorse based solely on his silence;
even though he entered an Alford plea and remained silent as to the
factual basis for his guilty plea, he did not maintain that silence
during his sentencing and his statement to the trial court included
an apology of sorts. The trial court also identified a number of factors
that it relied on in reaching its sentencing decision, including the
victim impact statement and the chronic sexual abuse defendant perpetrated
on his daughter.
Joreski v. State, 2012 WY 143, 288 P.3d 413,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2012).

Sentence for guilty plea within reason. —

Where defendant was sentenced to 16-20 years after pleading guilty to 3 counts under this section and considering the whole picture presented to the district court, the court's sentencing decision did not exceed the bounds of reason under the circumstances. Dodge v. State, 951 P.2d 383,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1997).

New trial not required. —

The defendant was not entitled to a new trial in a prosecution for his commission of an immoral act with his then one-and-a-half-year-old son, notwithstanding his assertion of newly discovered evidence consisting of a calendar containing notations made by the defendant's wife and evidence which he alleged showed that his wife testified falsely with respect to a guardian ad litem report. Baumgartner v. State, 7 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2000).

Motion to withdraw guilty plea denied.—

District court did not abuse its discretion when it denied defendant's motion to withdraw his guilty plea because counsel's performance was not deficient for failure to advise defendant of the affirmative defense that applied if criminality of conduct depended on a victim being under 16 years of age; because defendant pleaded guilty to third-degree sexual abuse of a minor, in which criminality depended on a victim who is less than 17)years of age, the affirmative defense did not apply. Berger v. State, 2017 WY 90, 399 P.3d 621,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2017).

Effect of amendments. —

Where amendment to this section became effective March 19, 1996, and crimes were alleged to have been committed between March 1, 1996, and May 31, 1996, this section was to be applied as it appeared on March 1, 1996. Metzger v. State, 4 P.3d 901,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. June 12, 2000).

Error to exclude witness testimony. —

In a juvenile proceeding, the trial court erred in excluding two of defendant's proposed witnesses from testifying for violating its oral exclusionary order where there was no evidence presented nor was it claimed that one witness spoke to the other witness with the knowledge or consent of defendant or his counsel and reasonable confusion remained on the part of defendant and his counsel regarding the extent of the oral order entered by the court. KC v. State, 2004 WY 74, 92 P.3d 805,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

Boggs v. State, 589 P.2d 839,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo. 1979); Ketcham v. State, 618 P.2d 1356,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1980); Larsen v. State, 686 P.2d 583,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 326

(Wyo. 1984); In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985); Schwenke v. State, 768 P.2d 1031,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1989); Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990); Brown v. State, 817 P.2d 429,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1991); Daniel v. State, 923 P.2d 728,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1996); Hayes v. State, 935 P.2d 700,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Triplett v. State, 802 P.2d 162,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1990); Lovato v. State, 901 P.2d 408,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1995); Cook v. State, 7 P.3d 53,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2000); Chapman v. State, 2001 WY 25, 18 P.3d 1164,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2001); Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003); DRW v. DLP (In re ARW), 2015 WY 25,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Feb. 19, 2015).

Stated

in

Zabel v. State, 765 P.2d 357,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Fortin v. State, 622 P.2d 418,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1981); Auclair v. State, 660 P.2d 1156,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1983); Smallwood v. State, 748 P.2d 1141,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1988); Krow v. State, 840 P.2d 261,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1992); Britton v. State, 845 P.2d 1374,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1992); Brown v. State, 894 P.2d 597,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1995); Vernier v. State, 909 P.2d 1344,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996); Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996); Brock v. State, 967 P.2d 26,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1998); Hornecker v. State, 977 P.2d 1289,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1999); James v. State, 998 P.2d 389,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2000); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000); Reagan v. State, 14 P.3d 925,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 2000); Clingman v. State, 2001 WY 46, 23 P.3d 27,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2001); Goulart v. State, 2003 WY 108, 76 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2003); Hirsch v. State, 2006 WY 66, 135 P.3d 586,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. May 31, 2006); Montez v. State, 2009 WY 17, 201 P.3d 434,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 12, 2009); Palmer v. State, 2009 WY 129, 218 P.3d 941,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Oct. 22, 2009); McDowell v. State, 2014 WY 21,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 22

, 2014 WL 547499 (Feb 11, 2014); Woods v. State, 2017 WY 111, 401 P.3d 962,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For case note, “Wyoming's Indecent Liberties Statute — Victim Consent is Now a ‘Relevant Fact for Jury Deliberation’; Did Pierson Put a Bandage on Wyoming's Criminal Code Bullet Wound?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1999).

For comment, “An Examination of Wyoming's Indecent Liberties Statute and Proposals for Reform,” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 529 (2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes or ordinances regulating sexual performance by child, 42 ALR5th 291.

§ 6-2-317.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree.

Except under circumstance constituting sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second or third degree as defined by W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-316

, an actor commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree if:

Being less than sixteen (16) years of age, the actor engages in sexual contact with a victim who is less than thirteen (13) years of age, and the victim is at least three (3) years younger than the actor; or

Being twenty (20) years of age or older, the actor engages in sexual contact with a victim who is either sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age, and the victim is at least four (4) years younger than the actor, and the actor occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim.

A person convicted under subsection (a) of this section is subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

A person charged with violating the provisions of paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be subject to the original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, except the matter may be transferred to the district court having jurisdiction of the offense as provided in W.S.

14-6-237

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Applied

in

Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Oct. 22, 2009).